src/iku-lex.txt
!==================================================================================!
!This is the file that hosts the morphology for the Inuktitut morphological parser !
!Rules for phonology and orthography are kept in the rule-file xfst-iku.txt      !
!==================================================================================!

Multichar_Symbols
+N +V +Part
+Sg +Du +Pl
+1Sg +2Sg +3Sg +4Sg +1Du +2Du +3Du +4Du +1Pl +2Pl +3Pl +4Pl
+1SgO +2SgO +3SgO +4SgO +1DuO +2DuO +3DuO +4DuO +1PlO +2PlO+3PlO +4PlO !Objects' persons
+Abs +Rel +Trm +Loc +Abl +Mod !cases
+Ind +Cau +ConReal +ConUnreal !Voiced is unrealized and voiceless is for ongoing or realized actions.
+Arch !tags for archaic forms. In the pilot just use to indicate twin forms not trying to validate relative age 

!ch sr kh qh ! no digraphs
ľ !digraphs plus ľ for voiceless palatalized l
%> !morphemeborder
%TRUNC !truncation dummy
%CVCTRUNC !dummy for very long truncations
%VCTRUNC !dummy for long truncation
%FRIC !dummy for fricativizing stem-final consonants. Needed to avoid a general rule that also would affect unwantedly as in *aaġagu for aaqagu. The alternative would have been to postulate truncating flexives with a fricative first consonant (*aiviq -q +ġit) but that is hokus pokus
%EBLOCK !dummy to block schwa going to a (aŋutik not *aŋuttak)
%C ! dummy for intermediate gemination
%DEFRIC !dummy when fricatives go stops (amaġuq -> amaqquk) as apposed to %C in niġi+VIK -> niġġivik
%SCHWADEL !dummy with derivatives truncating semi-final schwa
!%CLIT !dummy with clitics used in Kalaallisut. This far unused in iku

@P.IV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive wants IV suff
@P.TV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive wants TV suff
@R.IV.ON@ !Flag - require test for intransitivity   gets IV suff
@R.TV.ON@ !Flag - positive inquiry for intransitive gets TV siff
@D.IV.ON@ !Flag - disallow test - delete string if unsaturated flag (
@D.TV.ON@ !Flag - disalloq test - delete string if unsaturated flag (=Verb was not transitive)


!************************************
!Derivational morphemes and clitics *
!************************************

+LLATU +LLATU=NIAQ +NIAQ +NIAQ=ŊIT +ŊIT +SAAĠE +SAAĠE=ŊIT +TEQ ! verb elaborating
+VIK ! nominalizers
+LU +GUUQ +UNA! clitics


! This file gives the start and end of the Iñupiaq lexicon. 
! The lexicon Root points at the different parts of speech.
! Each POS has its own file noun-iku-lex.txt, etc., which in
! turn points to noun-iku-morph.txt, etc.
! POS-changing nominalizers are found in verb-iku-morph.txt and verbalizers in noun-iku-morph.txt
! It might be a good idea to have noun-iku-der.txt etc. as well.
! The common, final lexica, are found in this file.


LEXICON Root
	Nouns ;
	prop ;
	pron ;
	Verbs ;
!About lexica and continuations. Instead of separate lexica for words that can only be sing or only plur and others for words that can take all numbers, this is a better solution: Normal nouns are tagged tp, tup etc. whereas specials are tagged with the continuation lexicon


LEXICON part
+Part:%>	clit ;

LEXICON clit_sing
+UNA:%>una	clit ;
	clit ;

LEXICON clit
+GUUQ:%>guuq	f ;
+LU:%>lu	f ;
	        f ;

LEXICON f
< "@D.[IT]V.ON@" >  # ;

!@D.IV.ON@  # ;
!@D.TV.ON@  # ;
